Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202045-189
Loan brokers; legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that:

(1) Many professional groups are presently licensed or otherwise regulated
by the State of Nebraska in the interest of public protection;

(2) Certain questionable business practices, such as the collection
of an advance fee prior to the performance
of the service, misleads the public;

(3) Such practices are avoided by many professional groups and many
professional groups are regulated by the state to restrict practices which
tend to mislead or deceive the public;

(4) Loan brokers in Nebraska have engaged in the practice of collecting
an advance fee from borrowers in consideration for attempting to procure a
loan of money;

(5) Such practice, as well as others, by loan brokers has led the public
to believe that the loan broker has agreed to procure a loan for the borrower
when in fact the loan broker has merely promised to attempt to procure a loan;
and

(6) Regulation of loan brokers by the state, in similar fashion to that
of other professions, is necessary in order to protect the public welfare
and to promote the use of fair and equitable business practices.

Laws 1981, LB 154, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB75, § 2.